test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wapamew_gt-norm.yaml
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [wâpamakik, wâpamakik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [wâpamacik, wâpamacik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [wâpamâyâhkik, wâpamâyâhkik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [wâpamâyahkok, wâpamâyahkok]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [wâpamâyêkok, wâpamâyêkok] 
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [wâpamiyan, wâpamiyan]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [wâpamiyâhk, wâpamiyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [wâpamiyêk, wâpamiyêk]    
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamât, wâpamât]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamâcik, wâpamâcik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wâpamimât, wâpamimât]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wâpamimâcik, wâpamimâcik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wâpamâyit, wâpamâyit]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamimak, wâpamimak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamimat, wâpamimat]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamimâyâhk, wâpamimâyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamimâyahk, wâpamimâyahk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamimâyek, wâpamimâyek]
     
     
     
     
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [wâpamit, wâpamit]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [wâpamisk, wâpamisk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [wâpamikoyâhk, wâpamikoyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [wâpamikoyahk, wâpamikoyahk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [wâpamikoyek, wâpamikoyek]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [wâpamicik, wâpamicik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [wâpamiskik, wâpamiskik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [wâpamikoyâhkik, wâpamikoyâhkik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [wâpamikoyahkok, wâpamikoyahkok]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [wâpamikoyêkok, wâpamikoyêkok]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [wâpamitân, wâpamitân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [wâpamitâhk, wâpamitâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [wâpamitakok, wâpamitakok]

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [wâpamikot, wâpamikot]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [wâpamikocik, wâpamikocik]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wâpamikoyit, wâpamikoyit]
          
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [wâpamiyit, wâpamiyit]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [wâpamiyisk, wâpamiyisk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [wâpamikoyâhk, wâpamikoyâhk, wâpamikowâyâhk, wâpamikowâyâhk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [wâpamikoyêk, wâpamikoyêk, wâpamikowâyêk, wâpamikowâyêk]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [wâpamikoyahk, wâpamikoyahk, wâpamikowâyahk, wâpamikowâyahk]
     




     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wâpam
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamâtân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamihk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wâpamâtânik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wâpamihkok

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamâhkan
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wâpamâhkahk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamâhkêk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wâpamâhkanik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wâpamâhkahkok
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wâpamâhkêkok

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wâpamin
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: wâpaminân
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wâpamik
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wâpamîhkan
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: wâpamîhkâhk
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wâpamîhkêk
     
     
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-wâpamimâw, niwîwîciwâpamimâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimâw, kiwîwîciwâpamimâw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-wâpamimânân, niwîwîciwâpamimânân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimânaw, kiwîwîciwâpamimânaw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimâwâw, kiwîwîciwâpamimâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-wâpamimâwak, niwîwîciwâpamimâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimâwak, kiwîwîciwâpamimâwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-wâpamimânânak, niwîwîciwâpamimânânak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimânawak, kiwîwîciwâpamimânawak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimâwâwak, kiwîwîciwâpamimâwâwak]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimin, kiwîwîciwâpamimin]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamiminân, kiwîwîciwâpamiminân]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamiminâwâw, kiwîwîciwâpamiminâwâw]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamêw, wîwâpamêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamêwak, wîwâpamêwak]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamêyiwa, wîwâpamêyiwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamimêw, wîwâpamimêw]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wâpamimêwak, wîwâpamimêwak]
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-wâpamimimâwa, niwîwîciwâpamimimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimimâwa, kiwîwîciwâpamimimâwa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-wâpamimimânâna, niwîwîciwâpamimimânâna]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimimânawa, kiwîwîciwâpamimimânawa]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Ind+Rel+Fut+Int+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-wâpamimimâwâwa, kiwîwîciwâpamimimâwâwa]

     
     
     
     

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: wâpamaki
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: wâpamaci
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: wâpamâyâhki
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [wâpamâyahko, wâpamâyahki]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: wâpamâyêko

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wâpamâci
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wâpamâtwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wâpamâyici
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: wâpamakwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: wâpamatwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: wâpamâyâhkwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: wâpamâyahkwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: wâpamâyêkwâwi

     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: wâpamici
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: wâpamiski
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: wâpamikoyâhki
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [wâpamikoyahko, wâpamikoyahki]
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: wâpamikoyêko
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wâpamikoci
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wâpamikotwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wâpamikoyici
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: wâpamitwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: wâpamiskwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: wâpamikoyâhkwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: wâpamikoyahkwâwi
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: wâpamikoyêkwâwi
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: wâpamiyani
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: wâpamiyêko
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: wâpamiyâhki
     
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: wâpamitâni
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: wâpamitako
     wâpamêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: wâpamitâhki
